Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-204
Aquaculture facility, defined.

Aquaculture facility means any facility, structure, lake, pond, tank, or tanker truck used for the purpose of propagating, selling, brokering, trading, or transporting cultured aquatic stock.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 14.